Louisiana, session 2026, SB105.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 17:5029(E)(1) and 5029(E)(1)(d) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5029. Alternative initial eligibility requirements
* * *
E.(1) Notwithstanding the initial eligibility requirements established by this
Chapter, effective for the 2020-2021, 2021-2022, and 2022-2023 academic years, an
individual who was honorably discharged from a branch of the United States Armed
Forces from a military installation in Louisiana shall be eligible to receive a
TOPS-Tech Award, provided he meets all of the following requirements:
* * *
(d) Earned a 17 or higher score on the ACT or an equivalent concordant value
on the SAT, or attained a silver level score or higher on the ACT WorkKeys system
of assessments Provides a copy of the individual's Certificate of Release or
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 105 ENROLLED
Discharge from Active Duty, known as DD Form 214, to verify qualifying
military service.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.